Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 6 Interference with Lawful Taking

Cross references.

Removal of traps or trapped wildlife, §

27-3-65

.

27-3-150.
“Lawful taking” defined.

As used in this article, the term “lawful taking” means taking wildlife when such taking is authorized by the provisions of this title or by rules or regulations of the board adopted pursuant to the authority of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1460, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment on hunter harassment statutes, see 48 Emory L.J. 1023
(1999).

27-3-151.
Activity prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Interfere with the lawful taking of wildlife by another person by intentionally preventing or attempting to prevent such person from such lawful taking of wildlife;

Disturb or engage in activity tending to disturb wildlife for the purpose of intentionally preventing or attempting to prevent the lawful taking of such wildlife; or

Fail to obey an order of a law enforcement officer to desist from conduct violating paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection if the law enforcement officer observes such conduct or if the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds for believing that the person has engaged in such conduct that day or that the person plans or intends to engage in such conduct that day at a specific location.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be construed to apply to the activities of law enforcement officers or employees of the department in the performance of their duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1460, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “subsection” was substituted for “Code section” in paragraph (a)(3).

27-3-152.
Injunctions; damages for violations.

The superior court of a county may enjoin conduct which would be in violation of Code Section 27-3-151 upon the petition of a person who is affected or who reasonably may be affected by such conduct upon a showing that such conduct is threatened or that such conduct has occurred at a particular location in the past and that it is not unreasonable to expect that under similar circumstances such conduct will be repeated.

A person who engages in conduct in violation of Code Section 27-3-151 shall be civilly liable to any other person who is adversely affected by such conduct, and any award for damages may include punitive damages. In addition to any other items of special damage, the measure of damages may include expenditures of the affected person for license and permit fees, travel, guides, and special equipment and supplies to the extent that such expenditures were rendered futile by preventing the lawful taking of wildlife.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1460, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 27.